Maryland, session 2026, HB1190.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Public Utilities
7–219.1.
(A) IN THIS SECTION, “OFF–GRID ELECTRICITY PROVIDER” MEANS A
PERSON THAT OWNS OR OPERATES AN ELECTRIC GENERATING FACILITY THAT:
(1) DOES NOT INTERCONNECT WITH THE ELECTRIC SYSTEM IN THE
STATE;
(2) DOES NOT CROSS STATE LINES; AND
EXPLANATION: CAPITALS INDICATE MATTER ADDED TO EXISTING LAW.
[Brackets] indicate matter deleted from exist in g l aw . *hb1190*

HOUSE BILL 1190
(3) IS NOT LOCATED WITHIN AND DOES NOT CROSS ANY FEDERAL,
STATE, OR LOCAL ROADWAY OR RIGHT–OF–WAY.
(B) THIS SECTION APPLIES ONLY TO OFF–GRID ELECTRICITY PROVIDERS
THAT BEGIN TO GENERATE, TRANSMIT, DISTRIBUTE, OR SELL ELECTRICITY ON OR
AFTER OCTOBER 1, 2026.
(C) (1) EXCEPT AS PROVIDED IN PARAGRAPH (2) OF THIS SUBSECTION
AND NOTWITHSTANDING ANY OTHER PROVISION OF LAW, AN OFF–GRID
ELECTRICITY PROVIDER IS EXEMPT FROM ANY PROVISION OF THIS ARTICLE AND
ANY REGULATION, ORDER, OR PERMIT ADOPTED OR ISSUED UNDER THIS ARTICLE.
(2) AN OFF–GRID ELECTRICITY PROVIDER SHALL COMPLY WITH THE
REQUIREMENTS IN §§ 7–207 AND 7–207.1 OF THIS SUBTITLE WHEN CONSTRUCTING
AN ELECTRIC GENERATING FACILITY.
(D) ANY PERSON THAT QUALIFIED AS AN OFF–GRID ELECTRICITY
PROVIDER WHOSE ELECTRIC GENERATING FACILITY SUBSEQUENTLY
INTERCONNECTS WITH THE ELECTRIC SYSTEM IN THE STATE, CROSSES STATE
LINES, OR BECOMES LOCATED WITHIN OR CROSSES ANY FEDERAL, STATE, OR
MUNICIPAL ROADWAY OR RIGHT–OF–WAY MAY NO LONGER BE CONSIDERED AN
OFF–GRID ELECTRICITY PROVIDER FOR THE PURPOSES OF THIS SECTION.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect
October 1, 2026.